Wisconsin, session 2025, SB308.
do enact as follows:SB308,91014Section 9101. Nonstatutory provisions; Administration.SB308,1,65(1) Grant to Lutheran Social Services of Wisconsin and Upper 6Michigan.SB308,2,51(a) In the 2025-26 fiscal year, the department of administration shall award a 2grant in the amount of $1,000,000 to Lutheran Social Services of Wisconsin and 3Upper Michigan, Inc., to assist in the purchase and renovation of the Libertas 4Treatment Center in the city of Chippewa Falls to provide a 50-bed treatment 5center to men with substance use disorders who are in need of recovery services.SB308,2,86(b) The legislature finds and determines that the grant under par. (a) serves a 7public purpose by addressing the need for recovery services of men in this state who 8suffer from substance use disorders.SB308,2,99